Nebraska, session 109, LB26.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB26 LB26
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 28-929.01, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is amended to read:
28-929.01 For purposes of sections 28-929, 28-929.02, 28-930,
28-931, and 28-931.01:
(1) Emergency care provider means (a) an emergency medical
responder; (b) an emergency medical technician; (c) an advanced emergency
medical technician; (d) a community paramedic; (e) a critical care
paramedic; or (f) a paramedic, as those persons are licensed and
classified under the Emergency Medical Services Practice Act;
(2) Health care professional means:
(a) A a physician or other health care practitioner who is licensed,
certified, or registered to perform specified health services consistent
with state law who practices at a hospital or a health clinic; or
(b) Any other employee of a hospital or health clinic;
(3) Health clinic has the definition found in section 71-416; and
(4) Hospital has the definition found in section 71-419.
Sec. 2. Original section 28-929.01, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
-2-